Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Chapter 108. Motor Vehicle Manufacturers, Distributors, and Dealers Franchising
§ 4094.
Refusal to honor succession to ownership; notice required.

If a manufacturer or distributor believes that good cause exists for refusing to honor the succession to the ownership of a new motor vehicle dealer by a family member of a deceased or incapacitated owner of a new motor vehicle dealer under the existing franchise agreement, the manufacturer or distributor may, not more than 60 days following receipt of notice of the designated family member’s intent to succeed to the ownership of the new motor vehicle dealer, or any personal or financial data that it has requested, serve upon the designated family member notice of its refusal to honor the succession and of its intent to discontinue the existing franchise with the dealer no sooner than 90 days from the date the notice is served.

The notice must state the specific grounds for the refusal to honor the succession and of its intent to discontinue the existing franchise with the new motor vehicle dealer no sooner than 90 days from the date the notice is served.

If notice of refusal and discontinuance is not timely served upon the family member, the franchise shall continue in effect subject to termination only as otherwise permitted by this chapter.

In the event of a conflict between the written instrument filed by the motor vehicle dealer with the manufacturer designating a certain person as his or her successor and the provisions of this section, the written instrument filed with the manufacturer shall govern.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 4095.
Burden of proof.

In determining whether good cause for the refusal to honor the succession exists, the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or importer has the burden of proving that the successor is a person who is not of good moral character or does not meet the franchisor’s existing and reasonable standards and, considering the volume of sales and service of the new motor vehicle dealer, uniformly applied minimum business experience standards in the market area.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982.

§ 4096.
Unlawful acts by manufacturers or distributors.

It shall be a violation of this chapter for any manufacturer, as defined under this chapter, to require, attempt to require, coerce, or attempt to coerce any new motor vehicle dealer in this State:

To order or accept delivery of any new motor vehicle, part or accessory thereof, equipment, or any other commodity not required by law or a recall campaign that shall not have been voluntarily ordered by the new motor vehicle dealer, except that this subdivision is not intended to modify or supersede any terms or provisions of the franchise requiring new motor vehicle dealers to market a representative line of those motor vehicles that the manufacturer or distributor is publicly advertising.

To order or accept delivery of any new motor vehicle with special features, accessories, or equipment not included in the list price of such motor vehicles as publicly advertised by the manufacturer or distributor.

To participate monetarily in an advertising campaign or contest, or to purchase any promotional materials, training materials, showroom, or other display decorations or materials at the expense of the new motor vehicle dealer, or to require any dealer without his or her prior written agreement to participate in any manufacturer’s rebate program or to require a dealer to contribute to a manufacturer’s warranty rebate program, either by discount or otherwise without prior notification and prior written consent of the dealer.

To enter into any agreement with the manufacturer or to do any other act prejudicial to the new motor vehicle dealer by threatening to terminate or cancel a franchise or any contractual agreement existing between the dealer and the manufacturer; except that this subdivision is not intended to preclude the manufacturer or distributor from insisting on compliance with the reasonable terms or provisions of the franchise or other contractual agreement, and notice in good faith to any new motor vehicle dealer of the new motor vehicle dealer’s violation of such terms or provisions shall not constitute a violation of the chapter.

To change the capital structure of the new motor vehicle dealer or the means by or through which the new motor vehicle dealer finances the operation of the dealership, provided that the new motor vehicle dealer at all times meets any reasonable capital standards determined by the manufacturer in accordance with uniformly applied criteria; and also provided that no change in the capital structure shall cause a change in the principal management or have the effect of a sale of the franchise without the consent of the manufacturer or distributor; said consent shall not be unreasonably withheld.

To refrain from participation in the management of, investment in, or the acquisition of any other line-make of new motor vehicle or related products; provided, however, that this subdivision does not apply unless the new motor vehicle dealer maintains a reasonable line of credit for each make or line-make of new motor vehicle, the new motor vehicle dealer remains in compliance with any reasonable facilities requirements of the manufacturer, and no change is made in the principal management of the new motor vehicle dealer. For purposes of this chapter, “reasonable facilities requirements” shall not include a requirement that a new motor vehicle dealer establish or maintain exclusive facilities, personnel, or display space.

The new motor vehicle dealer shall provide written notice to the manufacturer and the Board no less than 90 days prior to the dealer’s intent to participate in the management of, investment in, or acquisition of another line-make of new motor vehicles or related products.

Within 45 days of receipt of the notice from the dealer, the manufacturer may file with the Board a protest alleging specific facts to support its claim that the new motor vehicle dealer cannot maintain a reasonable line of credit for each make or line-make of new motor vehicle, the new motor vehicle dealer cannot remain in compliance with any reasonable facilities requirements of the manufacturer, or that a change is being made in the principal management of the new motor vehicle dealer. The manufacturer shall also serve the protest on the new motor vehicle dealer within the 45-day period. If the manufacturer does not file a protest with the Board within 45 days, then the dealer may participate in the management of, investment in, or acquisition of another line-make of new motor vehicles or related products as set forth in its written notice of intent.

Within 45 days of the receipt of a protest from a manufacturer, the Board shall meet, hear, and take evidence limited to the claims set forth in the manufacturer’s protest and make a determination on each of the manufacturer’s claims. The burden of proof shall be on the manufacturer. The decision of the Board shall be final and no appeal may be taken.

To assent to a release, assignment, novation, waiver, or estoppel that would relieve any person from liability to be imposed by this law or to require any controversy between a new motor vehicle dealer and a manufacturer, distributor, or representative to be referred to any person other than the duly constituted courts of the State or the United States of America, if such referral would be binding upon the new motor vehicle dealer.

To change the location of the dealership or to make any substantial alterations to the dealership premises or facilities when to do so would be unreasonable.

To change the location of the dealership or to make any substantial alterations to the dealership premises or facilities in the absence of written assurance from the manufacturer or distributor of a sufficient supply of new motor vehicles to justify the change in location or the alterations.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

1989, No. 84

, § 1;

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 4097.
Manufacturer violations.

It shall be a violation of this chapter for any manufacturer defined under this chapter:

To delay, refuse, or fail to deliver new motor vehicles or new motor vehicle parts or accessories in a reasonable time, and in reasonable quantity relative to the new motor vehicle dealer’s facilities and sales potential in the new motor vehicle dealer’s relevant market area, after acceptance of an order from a new motor vehicle dealer having a franchise for the retail sale of any new motor vehicle sold or distributed by the manufacturer, any new motor vehicle, or parts or accessories to new vehicles as are covered by such franchise, if such vehicle, parts, or accessories are publicly advertised as being available for delivery or actually being delivered. This subdivision is not violated, however, if failure is caused by acts or causes beyond the control of the manufacturer.

To refuse to disclose to any new motor vehicle dealer handling the same line-make the manner and mode of distribution of that line-make within the State.

To obtain money, goods, service, or any other benefit from any other person with whom the new motor vehicle dealer does business, on account of, or in relation to, the transaction between the new motor vehicle dealer and such other person, other than for compensation for services rendered, unless such benefit is promptly accounted for, and transmitted to, the new motor vehicle dealer.

To increase prices of new motor vehicles that the new motor vehicle dealer had ordered for private retail consumers prior to the new motor vehicle dealer’s receipt of the written official price increase notification. A sales contract signed by a private retail consumer shall constitute evidence of each such order, provided that the vehicle is in fact delivered to that consumer. In the event of manufacturer price reductions or cash rebates paid to the new motor vehicle dealer, the amount of any reduction or rebate received by a new motor vehicle dealer shall be passed on to the private retail consumer by the new motor vehicle dealer. Price reductions shall apply to all vehicles in the dealer’s inventory that were subject to the price reduction. Price differences applicable to a new model or series shall not be considered a price increase or price decrease. Price changes caused by either the addition to a motor vehicle of required or optional equipment; or revaluation of the U.S. dollar, in the case of foreign-make vehicles or components; or an increase in transportation charges due to increased rates imposed by common carriers shall not be subject to the provisions of this subdivision.

To offer any refunds or other types of inducements to any person for the purchase of new motor vehicles of a certain line or make to be sold to the State or any political subdivision thereof without making the same offer available upon request to all other new motor vehicle dealers in the same line-make within the State.

To release to any outside party, except under subpoena or as otherwise required by law or in an administrative, judicial, or arbitration proceeding involving the manufacturer or new motor vehicle dealer, any business, financial, or personal information that may be from time to time provided by the new motor vehicle dealer to the manufacturer, without the express written consent of the new motor vehicle dealer.

To deny any new motor vehicle dealer the right of free association with any other new motor vehicle dealer for any lawful purpose.

(8) (A)

For purposes of this subdivision (8), any manufacturer that is not a non-franchised zero-emission vehicle manufacturer competes with a new motor vehicle dealer if it engages in the business of any of the following with respect to new motor vehicles:

selling or leasing;

offering to sell or lease; or

soliciting or advertising the sale or lease.

A manufacturer shall not, however, be deemed to be competing when operating a dealership either temporarily for a reasonable period, or in a bona fide retail operation that is for sale to any qualified independent person at a fair and reasonable price, or in a bona fide relationship in which an independent person has made a significant investment subject to loss in the dealership and can reasonably expect to acquire full ownership of the dealership on reasonable terms and conditions.

(C)

A manufacturer shall not, however, be deemed to be competing when operating a dealership either temporarily for a reasonable period, or in a bona fide retail operation that is for sale to any qualified independent person at a fair and reasonable price, or in a bona fide relationship in which an independent person has made a significant investment subject to loss in the dealership and can reasonably expect to acquire full ownership of the dealership on reasonable terms and conditions.

Subdivision (8) effective until July 1, 2022; see also subdivision (8) effective July 1, 2022 set out below.

To compete with a new motor vehicle dealer operating under an agreement or franchise from the aforementioned manufacturer in the State.

To unfairly discriminate among its new motor vehicle dealers with respect to warranty reimbursement.

To unreasonably withhold consent to a change in executive management or the sale, transfer, or exchange of the franchise to a qualified buyer capable of being licensed as a new motor vehicle dealer in this State. If a new motor vehicle dealer desires to make a change in its executive management or ownership or to sell its principal assets, the new motor vehicle dealer will give the franchisor written notice of the proposed change or sale. The franchisor shall not arbitrarily refuse to agree to such proposed change or sale and may not disapprove or withhold approval of such change or sale unless the franchisor can prove that:

its decision is not arbitrary; and

the new management, owner, or transferee is unfit or unqualified to be a dealer based on the franchisor’s prior written, reasonable, objective standards or qualifications that directly relate to the prospective transferee’s business experience, moral character, and financial qualifications.

To fail to respond in writing to a request for consent as specified in subdivision (10) of this section within 60 days of receipt of a written request on the forms, if any, generally utilized by the manufacturer or distributor for such purposes and containing the information required therein. Such failure to respond shall be deemed to be consent to the request.

To unfairly prevent a new motor vehicle dealer from receiving fair and reasonable compensation for the value of the new motor vehicle dealership.

To engage in any predatory practice or in any action or failure to act with respect to a new motor vehicle dealer if the action or failure to act is arbitrary, in bad faith, or discriminatory compared to similarly situated new motor vehicle dealers.

To terminate any franchise solely because of the death or incapacity of an owner who is not listed in the franchise as one on whose expertise and abilities the manufacturer relied in the granting of the franchise.

To require a motor vehicle franchisee to agree to a term or condition in a franchise, or in any lease related to the operation of the franchise or agreement ancillary or collateral to a franchise, as a condition to the offer, grant, or renewal of the franchise, lease, or agreement, that:

requires the motor vehicle franchisee to waive trial by jury in actions involving the motor vehicle franchisor;

specifies the jurisdictions, venues, or tribunals in which disputes arising with respect to the franchise, lease, or agreement shall or shall not be submitted for resolution or otherwise prohibits a motor vehicle franchisee from bringing an action in a particular forum otherwise available under the law of this State;

requires that disputes between the motor vehicle franchisor and motor vehicle franchisee be submitted to arbitration or to any other binding alternate dispute resolution procedure; provided, however, that any franchise, lease, or agreement may authorize the submission of a dispute to arbitration or to binding alternate dispute resolution if the motor vehicle franchisor and motor vehicle franchisee voluntarily agree to submit the dispute to arbitration or binding alternate dispute resolution at the time the dispute arises;

provides that in any administrative or judicial proceeding arising from any dispute with respect to the agreements in this section that the franchisor shall be entitled to recover its costs, reasonable attorney’s fees, and other expenses of litigation from the franchisee; or

grants the manufacturer an option to purchase the franchise, or real estate, or business assets of the franchisee.

To impose unreasonable standards of performance or unreasonable facilities, financial, operating, or other requirements upon a motor vehicle franchisee.

To fail or refuse to sell or offer to sell to all motor vehicle franchisees of a line-make, all models manufactured for that line-make, or to require a motor vehicle franchisee to do any of the following as a prerequisite to receiving a model or series of vehicles: requiring the dealer to pay any extra fee; requiring a dealer to execute a separate franchise agreement, purchase unreasonable advertising displays or other materials, or relocate, expand, improve, remodel, renovate, recondition, or alter the dealer’s existing facilities; or requiring the dealer to provide exclusive facilities. However, a manufacturer may require reasonable improvements to the existing facility that are necessary to accommodate special or unique features of a specific model or line. The failure to deliver any such motor vehicle, however, shall not be considered a violation of this section if the failure is due to a lack of manufacturing capacity or to a strike or labor difficulty, a shortage of materials, a freight embargo, or other cause over which the franchisor has no control. This subdivision shall not apply to a manufacturer of a motor home.

To prevent or attempt to prevent any new motor vehicle dealer or any officer, partner, or stockholder of any new motor vehicle dealer from transferring any part of the interest of any of them to any other person; provided, however, that no dealer, officer, partner, or stockholder shall have the right to sell, transfer, or assign the franchise or power of management or control without the consent of the manufacturer or distributor unless such consent is unreasonably withheld. Failure to respond within 60 days of receipt of a written request and applicable manufacturer application forms and related reasonable information customarily required for consent to a sale, transfer, or assignment shall be deemed consent to the request. Within 20 days of receipt of notice from the dealer, the manufacturer shall provide the dealer with a copy of all application forms and all other required reasonable information necessary to evaluate the dealer’s request.

To provide any term or condition in any lease or other agreement ancillary or collateral to a franchise, which term or condition directly or indirectly violates this title.

To use a promotional program or device or an incentive, payment, or other benefit, whether paid at the time of sale of the new motor vehicle to the dealer or later, that results in the sale of or offer to sell a new motor vehicle at a lower price, including the price for vehicle transportation, than the price at which the same model similarly equipped is offered or is available to another dealer in the State during a similar time period. This subdivision shall not prohibit a promotional or incentive program that is available functionally and equally to competing dealers of the same line-make in the State.

To vary the price charged to any of its franchised new motor vehicle dealers located in this State for new motor vehicles based on:
(21) (A) To vary the price charged to any of its franchised new motor vehicle dealers located in this State for new motor vehicles based on:

the dealer’s purchase of new facilities, supplies, tools, equipment, or other merchandise from the manufacturer;

the dealer’s relocation, remodeling, repair, or renovation of existing dealerships or construction of a new facility;

the dealer’s participation in training programs sponsored, endorsed, or recommended by the manufacturer;

whether or not the dealer offers for sale more than one line-make of new motor vehicle in the same dealership facility;

the dealer’s sales penetration, sales volume, or level of sales or customer service satisfaction;

the dealer’s purchase of advertising materials, signage, nondiagnostic computer hardware or software, communications devices, or furnishings; or

the dealer’s participation in used motor vehicle inspection or certification programs sponsored or endorsed by the manufacturer.

The price of the vehicle, for purposes of this subdivision (21), shall include the manufacturer’s use of rebates, credits, or other consideration that has the effect of causing a variance in the price of new motor vehicles offered to its franchised dealers located in the State.

To modify a franchise during the term of the franchise or upon its renewal if the modification substantially and adversely affects the new motor vehicle dealer’s rights, obligations, investment, or return on investment without giving 60 days’ written notice of the proposed modification to the new motor vehicle dealer, unless the modification is required by law, court order, or the Board. Within the 60-day notice period, the new motor vehicle dealer may file with the Board and serve notice upon the manufacturer a protest requesting a determination of whether there is good cause for permitting the proposed modification. Multiple protests pertaining to the same proposed modification shall be consolidated for hearing. The proposed modification shall not take effect pending the determination of the matter. The manufacturer shall have the burden of establishing good cause for the proposed modification. In determining whether there is good cause for permitting a proposed modification, the Board shall consider any relevant factors, including:

the reasons for the proposed modification;

whether the proposed modification is applied to or affects all new motor vehicle dealers in a nondiscriminatory manner;

whether the proposed modification will have a substantial and adverse effect upon the new motor vehicle dealer’s investment or return on investment;

whether the proposed modification is in the public interest;

whether the proposed modification is necessary to the orderly and profitable distribution of products by the manufacturer; and

whether the proposed modification is offset by other modifications beneficial to the new motor vehicle dealer.

To engage in any action that is arbitrary, in bad faith, or unconscionable.

To change the relevant market area set forth in the franchise agreement without good cause. For purposes of this subdivision, good cause shall include changes in the dealer’s registration pattern, demographics, customer convenience, and geographic barriers.

(8) (A)

Subdivision (8) effective July 1, 2022; see also subdivision (8) effective until July 1, 2022 set out above.

To compete with a new motor vehicle dealer operating under an agreement or franchise from the aforementioned manufacturer in the State.

(B)

For purposes of this subdivision (8), any manufacturer that is not a non-franchised zero-emission vehicle manufacturer competes with a new motor vehicle dealer if it engages in the business of any of the following with respect to new motor vehicles or the retail sale of parts and accessories for those new motor vehicles:

selling or leasing;

offering to sell or lease;

soliciting or advertising the sale or lease; or

offering through a subscription or like agreement.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

1989, No. 84

, § 2;

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009;

2021, No. 63

, § 4, eff. June 7, 2021;

2021, No. 63

, § 4a, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 4098.
Limitations on establishing or relocating dealers.

In the event that a manufacturer seeks to enter into a franchise establishing an additional new motor vehicle dealer or relocating an existing new motor vehicle dealer within or into a relevant market area where the same line-make is then represented, the manufacturer shall in writing first give notice to the Transportation Board and notify each new motor vehicle dealer in such line-make in the relevant market area of the intention to establish an additional dealer or to relocate an existing dealer within or into that market area. Within 20 days of receiving such notice or within 20 days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the manufacturer, any such new motor vehicle dealer may file a protest with the Board opposing the establishing or relocating of the new motor vehicle dealer. A copy of the protest shall be served on the manufacturer within the 20-day period. When such a protest is filed, the manufacturer shall not establish or relocate the proposed new motor vehicle dealer until the Board has held a hearing, nor thereafter, if the Board has determined that there is not good cause for permitting the addition or relocation of such new motor vehicle dealer.

This section does not apply:

to the relocation of an existing dealer within that dealer’s relevant market area, provided that the relocation not be at a site within six miles of a licensed new motor vehicle dealer for the same line-make of motor vehicle; or

if the proposed new motor vehicle dealer is to be established at or within two miles of a location at which a former licensed new motor vehicle dealer for the same line-make of new motor vehicle had ceased operating within the previous two years.

In determining whether good cause has been established for entering into or relocating an additional new motor vehicle dealer for the same line-make, the Board shall take into consideration the existing circumstances, including:

permanency of the investment of both the existing and proposed new motor vehicle dealers;

growth or decline in population and new car registrations in the relevant market area;

effect on the consuming public in the relevant market area;

whether it is injurious or beneficial to the public welfare for an additional new motor vehicle dealer to be established;

whether the new motor vehicle dealers of the same line-make in that relevant market area are providing adequate competition and convenient customer care for the motor vehicles of the line-make in the market area, which shall include the adequacy of motor vehicle sales and service facilities, equipment, supply of motor vehicle parts, and qualified service personnel;

whether the establishment of an additional new motor vehicle dealer would increase competition, and therefore be in the public interest; and

the effect that the proposed franchise would have on the stability of existing franchisees in the same line-make in the relevant market area.

At any hearing conducted by the Board under this section, the manufacturer seeking to establish an additional new motor vehicle dealership or relocate an existing new motor vehicle dealership shall have the burden of proof in establishing that good cause exists.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 4099.
Civil actions for violations.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any agreement or franchise or the terms or provisions of any waiver, any consumer who is injured by a violation of this chapter, or any party to a franchise who is so injured in his or her business or property by a violation of this chapter relating to that franchise, or any person so injured because he or she refuses to accede to a proposal for an arrangement that if consummated, would be in violation of this chapter, may bring a civil action in a court having jurisdiction to enjoin further violations, and to recover the actual damages sustained by him or her together with the costs of the suit, including a reasonable attorney’s fee. An action, filed in a court of competent jurisdiction, that gives rise or could give rise to a claim or defense under this chapter must be stayed if, within 60 days after the date of filing of the complaint or service of process, whichever is later, a party to the action files a complaint with the Board asserting the claims or defenses under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 4100.
Applicability.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to the conduct of all persons affected by the presumptions of this chapter situated in this State. Any person who engages directly or indirectly in purposeful contacts within this State in connection with the offering or advertising for sale of, or has business dealings with respect to, a new motor vehicle within the State shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter and the jurisdiction of the courts of this State. Any and all amendments to this chapter shall apply to existing franchise agreements and franchise agreements entered into on or after June 1, 2009.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 4100a.
Agreements governed.

All written agreements between a manufacturer or distributor and a new motor vehicle dealer shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter, and provisions of such agreements that are inconsistent with this chapter shall be void as against public policy and unenforceable in court or with the Board.

Every new selling agreement or amendment made to such agreement between a new motor vehicle dealer and a manufacturer or distributor shall include, and if omitted, shall be presumed to include, the following language: “If any provision herein contravenes the valid laws or rules of the State of Vermont, such provision shall be deemed to be modified to conform to such laws or rules; or if any provision herein, including arbitration provisions, denies, or purports to deny access to the procedures, forums, or remedies provided for by such laws or rules, such provision shall be void and unenforceable; and all other terms and provisions of this agreement shall remain in full force and effect.”

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 4100b.
Enforcement; Transportation Board.

The Transportation Board established in

19 V.S.A. § 3

shall enforce the provisions of this chapter.

The Board shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Except for civil actions filed in Superior Court pursuant to section 4099 of this title, the Board shall have the following exclusive powers:

Any person may file a written protest with the Board complaining of conduct governed by and in violation of this chapter. The Board shall hold a public hearing in accordance with the rules adopted by the Board.

The Board shall issue written decisions and may issue orders to any person in violation of this chapter.

The parties to protests shall be permitted to conduct and use the same discovery procedures as are provided in civil actions in the Superior Court.

The Board shall be empowered to determine the location of hearings, appoint persons to serve at the deposition of out-of-state witnesses, administer oaths, and authorize stenographic or recorded transcripts of proceedings before it. Prior to the hearing on any protest, but no later than 45 days after the filing of the protest, the Board shall require the parties to the proceeding to attend a prehearing conference in which the Chair or designee shall have the parties address the possibility of settlement. If the matter is not resolved through the conference, the matter shall be placed on the Board’s calendar for hearing. Settlement communications shall remain confidential, shall be exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act, shall not be disclosed, and shall not be used as an admission in any subsequent hearing.

Compliance with the discovery procedures authorized by subsection (d) of this section may be enforced by application to the Board. Obedience to subpoenas issued to compel witnesses or documents may be enforced by application to the Superior Court in the county where the hearing is to take place.

Any party to any proceeding under this chapter who recklessly or knowingly fails, neglects, or refuses to comply with an order issued by the Board shall be fined a civil penalty not to exceed $2,500.00. Each day of noncompliance shall be considered a separate violation of such order.

Within 20 days after any order or decision of the Board, any party to the proceeding may apply for a rehearing with respect to any matter determined in the proceeding or covered or included in the order or decision. The application for rehearing shall set forth fully every ground upon which it is claimed that the decision or order complained of is unlawful or unreasonable. No appeal from any order or decision of the Board shall be taken unless the appellant makes an application for rehearing as provided in this subsection, and when the application for rehearing has been made, no ground not set forth in the application shall be urged, relied on, or given any consideration by the Board unless the Board for good cause shown allows the appellant to specify additional grounds. Any party to the proceeding may appeal the final order, including all interlocutory orders or decisions, to the Superior Court within 30 days after the date the Board rules on the application for reconsideration of the final order or decision. All findings of the Board upon all questions of fact properly before the court shall be prima facie lawful and reasonable. The order or decision appealed from shall not be set aside or vacated except for errors of law. No additional evidence shall be heard or taken by the Superior Court on appeals from the Board.

In cases where the Board finds that a violation of this chapter has occurred or there has been a failure to show good cause under section 4089 or 4098 of this title, the Superior Court, upon petition, shall determine reasonable attorney’s fees and costs and award them to the prevailing party.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2015, No. 23

, § 7.

§ 4100c.
Financing; Vermont Transportation Board.

On July 1, 2009, and every year thereafter, there is imposed an annual fee upon each new motor vehicle dealer of $60.00 for each dealer license held by that dealer, and there is imposed upon each manufacturer an annual fee of $600.00 for each line-make of new motor vehicle that the manufacturer sells or distributes within this State.

Upon the filing of a protest under this chapter, the protesting party shall pay to the Board a filing fee of $1,500.00.

The Transportation Board shall administer the fees imposed under this section, and the fees shall be deposited into the Transportation Fund.

The amount of the fee imposed by this section is intended to correlate to the amount of funding required by the Transportation Board to administer its duties under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 4100d.
Statute of limitations.

Actions arising out of any provision of this chapter shall be commenced within four years of the date the cause of action accrues; provided, however, that if a person conceals the cause of action from the knowledge of the person entitled to bring it, the period prior to the discovery of the cause of action by the person so entitled shall be excluded in determining the time limited for commencement of the action.

Notwithstanding any provision in a franchise agreement, if a dispute covered by this chapter or any other law is submitted to mediation or arbitration, the time for the dealer to file a complaint, action, petition, or protest is tolled until the mediation or arbitration proceeding is completed.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 4100e.
Right of first refusal.

In the event of a proposed sale or transfer of all or substantially all ownership or transfer of all or substantially all dealership assets, and if the franchise agreement has a right of first refusal in favor of the manufacturer, distributor, or franchisor, then notwithstanding the terms of the franchise agreement, the manufacturer, distributor, or franchisor shall be permitted to exercise a right of first refusal to acquire the new motor vehicle dealer’s assets or ownership only if all of the following requirements are met:

In order to exercise the right of first refusal, the manufacturer or distributor shall notify the new motor vehicle dealer in writing of its intent to exercise its right of first refusal within the 60-day notice limit provided in subdivision 4097(11) of this title.

The exercise of the right of first refusal will result in the owner of the dealership receiving the same or greater consideration as the owner has contracted to receive in connection with the proposed change of ownership or transfer.

The proposed change in the dealership’s ownership or transfer of assets does not involve the transfer or sale to any of the following members of the family of one or more owners:

a designated family member or members, including any of the following members of one or more dealer owners:

the spouse;

a child;

a grandchild;

the spouse of a child or a grandchild;

a sibling;

a parent;

a manager:

employed by the dealer in the dealership during the previous two years; and

who is otherwise qualified as a dealer operator;

a partnership or corporation controlled by any of the family members described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3);

a trust arrangement established or to be established:

for the purpose of allowing the new motor vehicle dealer to continue to qualify as such under the manufacturer’s or distributor’s standards; or

to provide for the succession of the franchise agreement to designated family members or qualified management in the event of the death or incapacity of the dealer or its principal owner or owners.

The manufacturer or distributor agrees to pay the reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees that do not exceed the usual, customary, and reasonable fees charged for similar work done for other clients, incurred by the proposed owner or proposed transferee prior to the manufacturer’s or distributor’s exercise of its right of first refusal in negotiating and implementing the contract for the proposed sale or transfer of the dealership or dealership assets.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 4100f.
Severability.

If any provision in this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provisions and applications, and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are severable.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.